District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.52

Enforcement mechanism against an agency.

(a)

If an agency fails to meet any of the goals set forth in § 2-218.41, the Department may require that a portion of the agency’s contracts and procurements be made part of a set-aside program for small business enterprises.

(b)

The performance plan for each agency shall include a metric for compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and the performance evaluation for each agency director shall reflect the agency’s success in meeting compliance goals.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2352, 52 DCR 7503
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(dd), 61 DCR 3892
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 designated the existing provisions as (a); and added (b).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2352 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.